Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 55
COLORADO STATE UNIVERSITY - PUEBLO

23-55-101 to 23-55-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article repealed, p. 550, §§ 7, 8, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 17 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2007, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to article 31.5 of this title. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following those section that were relocated and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.